Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5963.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28B.76.525 and 2025 c 424 s 926 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The state financial aid account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The primary purpose of the account is to ensure that all appropriations designated for financial aid through statewide student financial aid programs are made available to eligible students. The account shall be a nontreasury account.(2) The office shall deposit in the account all money received for the Washington college grant program established under chapter 28B.92 RCW, the state work-study program established under chapter 28B.12 RCW, the Washington scholars program established under RCW 28A.600.110, the Washington award for vocational excellence program established under RCW 28C.04.525, ((and)) the educational opportunity grant program established under chapter 28B.101 RCW, and the passport to careers program established under chapter 28B.117 RCW. The account shall consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the programs listed in this subsection and private contributions to the programs. Moneys deposited in the account do not lapse at the close of the fiscal period for which they were appropriated. Both during and after the fiscal period in which moneys were deposited in the account, the office may expend moneys in the account only for the purposes for which they were appropriated, and the expenditures are subject to any other conditions or limitations placed on the appropriations.(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships to students eligible for the programs according to program rules and policies. For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, expenditures may also be used for scholarship awards in the passport to career program established under chapter 28B.117 RCW. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.(4) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.(5) Only the director of the office or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.(6) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the state financial aid account to the state general fund.Sec. 2. RCW 28B.92.200 and 2024 c 323 s 1 and 2024 c 116 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The Washington college grant program is created to provide a statewide free college program for eligible participants and greater access to postsecondary education for Washington residents. The Washington college grant program is intended to increase the number of high school graduates and adults that can attain a postsecondary credential and provide them with the qualifications needed to compete for job opportunities in Washington.(2) The office shall implement and administer the Washington college grant program and is authorized to establish rules necessary for implementation of the program.(3) The legislature shall appropriate funding for the Washington college grant program. Allocations must be made on the basis of estimated eligible participants enrolled in eligible institutions of higher education or apprenticeship programs. All eligible students are entitled to a Washington college grant beginning in academic year 2020-21.(4) The office shall award Washington college grants to all eligible students beginning in academic year 2020-21.(5) To be eligible for the Washington college grant, students must meet the following requirements:(a)(i) Demonstrate financial need under RCW 28B.92.205;(ii) Receive one or more of the following types of public assistance:(A) Aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits under chapter 74.62 RCW;(B) Essential needs and housing support program benefits under RCW 43.185C.220; or(C) Pregnant women assistance program financial grants under RCW 74.62.030; ((or))(iii) Be a Washington high school student in the 10th, 11th, or 12th grade whose parent or legal guardian is receiving one or more of the types of public assistance listed in (a)(ii) of this subsection and have received a certificate confirming eligibility from the office in accordance with RCW 28B.92.225; ((or))(iv) Beginning in the 2025-26 academic year, be a Washington high school student in the 10th, 11th, or 12th grade who is a member of an assistance unit receiving benefits under the Washington basic food program in chapter 74.04 RCW or the Washington food assistance program established under RCW 74.08A.120; or(v) Beginning in the 2026â27 academic year, be eligible for the passport to careers program as provided in RCW 28B.117.030(3);(b)(i) Be enrolled or accepted for enrollment for at least three quarter credits or the equivalent semester credits at an institution of higher education in Washington as defined in RCWÂ  28B.92.030; or(ii) Be enrolled in a registered apprenticeship program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW;(c) Be a resident student as defined in RCWÂ  28B.15.012(2) (a) through (e);(d) File an annual application for financial aid as approved by the office; and(e) Must not have earned a baccalaureate degree or higher from a postsecondary institution.(6) Washington college grant eligibility may not extend beyond six years or 150 percent of the published length of the program in which the student is enrolled or the credit or clock-hour equivalent.(7) Institutional aid administrators shall determine whether a student eligible for the Washington college grant in a given academic year may remain eligible for the ensuing year if the student's family income increases by no more than three percent.(8) Qualifications for receipt and renewal include maintaining satisfactory academic progress toward completion of an eligible program as determined by the office and established in rule.(9) Should a recipient terminate his or her enrollment for any reason during the academic year, the unused portion of the grant shall be returned to the state educational grant fund by the institution of higher education according to the institution of higher education's policy for issuing refunds, except as provided in RCW 28B.92.070.(10) An eligible student enrolled on a part-time basis shall receive a prorated portion of the Washington college grant for any academic period in which he or she is enrolled on a part-time basis.(11) The Washington college grant is intended to be used to meet the costs of postsecondary education for students with financial need. The student shall be awarded all need-based financial aid for which the student qualifies as determined by the institution.(12) Students and participating institutions of higher education shall comply with all the rules adopted by the council for the administration of this chapter.Sec. 3. RCW 28B.117.020 and 2022 c 78 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Apprentice" means a person enrolled in a state-approved, federally registered, or reciprocally recognized apprenticeship program.(2) "Apprenticeship" means an apprenticeship training program approved or recognized by the state apprenticeship council or similar federal entity.(3) "Cost of attendance" means the cost associated with attending a particular institution of higher education as determined by the office, including but not limited to tuition, fees, room, board, books, personal expenses, and transportation, plus the cost of reasonable additional expenses incurred by an eligible student and approved by a financial aid administrator at the student's school of attendance.(4) "Federal foster care system" means the foster care program under the federal unaccompanied refugee minors program, Title 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1522 of the immigration and nationality act of 1965, as amended.(5) "Financial need" means the difference between a student's cost of attendance and the student's total ((family contribution))student aid index as determined by the method prescribed by the United States department of education.(6) "Homeless" or "homelessness" means without a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence as set forth in the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.(7) "Independent college or university" means a private, nonprofit institution of higher education, open to residents of the state, providing programs of education beyond the high school level leading to at least the baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the Northwest association of schools and colleges, and other institutions as may be developed that are approved by the student achievement council as meeting equivalent standards as those institutions accredited under this section.(8) "Institution of higher education" means any institution eligible to and participating in the Washington college grant program.(9) "Occupational-specific costs" means the costs associated with entering an apprenticeship or preapprenticeship, including but not limited to fees, tuition for classes, work clothes, rain gear, boots, occupation-specific tools.(10) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.(11) "Preapprenticeship" means an apprenticeship preparation program recognized by the state apprenticeship council and as defined in RCW 28C.18.162.(12) "Program" means the passport to careers program created in this chapter.(13) "State foster care system" means out-of-home care pursuant to a dependency and includes the placement of dependents from other states who are placed in Washington pursuant to orders issued under the interstate compact on the placement of children, chapter 26.34 RCW.(14) "Tribal court" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 13.38.040.(15) "Tribal foster care system" means an out-of-home placement under a dependency order from a tribal court.(16) "Unaccompanied" means a youth or young adult experiencing homelessness while not in the physical custody of a parent or guardian.--- END ---